Missouri, session 2026, HB2633.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 37, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto four new sections, to be
known as sections 37.1300, 37.1310, 37.1320, and 37.1330, to read as follows:
37.1300. For the purposes of sections 37.1300 to 37.1330, the following terms
mean:
(1) "Council", the Missouri geospatial advisory council established in section
37.1310;
(2) "Geographic information system (GIS)", a computer system for capturing,
storing, checking, and displaying data related to positions on the Earth's surface that
enables easily seeing, analyzing, and understanding patterns and relationships;
(3) "Geospatial", relating to or denoting data that is associated with a particular
location;
(4) "Missouri Spatial Data Information Service" or "MSDIS", Missouri's
primary spatial data clearinghouse responsible for collecting and distributing vector
data, aerial photography, and light detection and ranging elevation data that are
generated, updated, and funded by state, local, and regional agencies and governments.
37.1310. There is hereby established within the office of administration the
"Missouri Geospatial Advisory Council", which is charged with assisting and advising
the state in ensuring the availability, implementation, and enhancement of a statewide
geospatial data infrastructure common to all jurisdictions through research, planning,
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2633 2
training, and education. The council shall represent all entities and jurisdictions before
appropriate policy-making authorities and the general assembly and shall strive
towards the immediate access to statewide geospatial data for all citizens of this state,
especially life-safety entities. The council shall be established within the office of the
commissioner of administration.
37.1320. 1. The council shall consist of members as follows:
(1) The commissioner of administration, or the commissioner's designee;
(2) The director of the department of agriculture, or the director's designee;
(3) The director of the department of conservation, or the director's designee;
(4) The director of the department of economic development, or the director's
designee;
(5) The director of the department of elementary and secondary education, or
the director's designee;
(6) The director of the department of health and senior services, or the director's
designee;
(7) The director of the department of natural resources, or the director's
designee;
(8) The Missouri military advocate, or the advocate's designee;
(9) The adjutant general of the department of the national guard, or the
adjutant general's designee;
(10) The director of the department of public safety, or the director's designee;
(11) The director of the department of revenue, or the director's designee;
(12) The director of the department of social services, or the director's designee;
(13) The director of the department of transportation, or the director's designee;
(14) The director of the United States Geological Survey, or the director's
designee;
(15) The director of the United States Department of Agriculture – Natural
Resource Conservation Service, or the director's designee;
(16) The director of the Missouri 911 service board, or the director's designee;
(17) The president of the University of Missouri system, or the president's
designee;
(18) The director of the Missouri Spatial Data Information Service, or the
director's designee;
(19) The director of the National Geospatial Intelligence Agency-West, or the
director's designee;
(20) A member of the state senate, appointed by the president pro tempore of the
senate;

HB 2633 3
(21) A member of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the
house of representatives;
(22) Thirteen citizens of Missouri, appointed by the commissioner of
administration. Such individuals shall represent a geographic balance from within
the state, representing both rural and urban areas with at least one individual from each
of the seven Missouri economic development regions, as determined by the Missouri
economic research information center. Such individuals shall additionally represent
city, county, and local government; the private sector; public safety; and academia; and
(23) Additional subject matter experts may participate in activities as non-
council members.
2. Appointed members of the council shall serve three-year terms and shall serve
until their successors are appointed. Vacancies on the council shall be filled in the same
manner as the original appointment and such members appointed shall serve the
remainder of the unexpired term.
3. The council shall meet monthly and as otherwise required by the
commissioner of the office of administration.
4. The council shall designate from its members a chair and chair-elect for one-
year terms and shall adopt written guidelines to govern the management of the council.
5. Each member of the council shall serve without compensation but may be
reimbursed for his or her actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of
his or her duties as a member of the council.
6. The commissioner of the office of administration shall designate an employee
of the office of administration as executive secretary for the council, who shall serve as a
nonvoting member and shall maintain the records of the council's activities and
decisions and shall be responsible for correspondence between the council and other
agencies.
7. The council may apply for federal and state grant programs to sponsor and
publish surveys of the condition and needs of geographic information in the state of
Missouri and to solicit or develop proposals for projects to be carried out in the state for
building and improving the state geospatial data infrastructure and workforce.
8. The council may apply for federal and state grant programs and conduct
other business as it relates to the development of geospatial workforce within Missouri.
9. The council shall provide recommendations on budget and staffing needs as it
relates to the development of geospatial related projects and initiatives to the office of
administration.
37.1330. The council shall have the following duties:

HB 2633 4
(1) To establish public and private partnerships throughout Missouri to
maximize value, minimize cost, and avoid redundant activities in the development and
implementation of geographic information systems;
(2) To foster efficient and secure methods for data sharing at all levels of
government;
(3) To coordinate, review, and provide recommendations on geographic
information systems programs and investments, and to provide assistance with
dispute resolution among geographic systems partners;
(4) To continue to establish Missouri's leadership role in the national effort to
improve capabilities for sharing geographic information and ideas with other states;
(5) To promote the use of geographic information systems technologies as tools
for breaking through structural and administrative boundaries in order to collaborate
on shared problems and enhance information analysis and decision-making processes
within all levels of government;
(6) To provide input and recommendations for the development of a strategy for
the maintenance and funding of a statewide base map and geographic information
system;
(7) To work jointly with officials from other state agencies, organizations, and
county, municipal, and tribal governments as well as with businesses and organizations
in the private sector that are concerned with the efficient management of the state's
geographic information systems resources;
(8) To recommend the development and adoption of policies and procedures
related to geographic information and geographic information systems;
(9) To serve as the statewide governing body for sharing and managing
geospatial framework data; and
(10) To provide oversight and guidance to the Missouri spatial data information
service and provide recommendations on budget and staffing needs to the office of
administration to implement the Missouri geospatial advisory council
recommendations.
✔